dictsource/xh_rules
// ***************************************************************************/ 
// *   Xhosa Language xh xh_rules                                            *
// *   Original Author Andy Vladescu, 2024                                   *
// *   Contact info: andyvladescu770@gmail.com                               *
// ***************************************************************************/
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/


.group a
   a       a
   
.group b
   b       b
   bh      b#H
   
.group c
   c       c[
   ch      c[H
   
.group d
   d       d
   dl      l#
   dy      d_j
   dz      dzH
   
.group e
   e       e
   
.group f
   f       f
   
.group g
   g       gH
   gc      g[H
   gq      g!H
   gr      Q
   gx      g#H

.group h
   h       h
   hh      H
   hl      l#

.group i
   i       i
   
.group j
   j       dZH

.group k
   k       k`?
   kr      kx2?

.group l
   l       l
   lh      l:

.group m
   m       m
   mh      m:
     _) m        m-
   m (A     m
     K) m (@@    _|m
     K) m (C     m-
     K) m (b@@   _|m
     K) m (v@   _|m
     K) m (w@@   _|m

.group n
   n       n
   nc      Nc[
   ng      n_j
   ngc     Nc[H
   ngh     N:
   ngq     Nq!
   ngx     Nx#H
   nh      n:
   nkc     Nc[?
   nkq     Nq!?
   nkx     Nx#?
   nq      Nq!
   nx      Nx#
   ny      n;
     _) n        n-
        n (A     n
        n (@@    n
        n (k     N
     _) n (k     N-
     _) n (k@@   N-
        n (g     N
     _) n (g     N-
     _) n (g@@   N-

.group o
   o       o
   
.group p
   p       p`?
   ph      ph

.group q
   q       q!

.group r
   r       r

.group s
   s       s
   sh      S

.group t
   t       t`?
   th      t#
   ths     tsh
   thsh    tS`?
   ts      ts?
   tsh     tSh
   ty      t_j?
   tyh     t_j?h

.group u
   u       u

.group v
   v       v

.group w
   w       w
   wh      w:

.group x
   x       x#
   xh      x#h

.group y
   y       j
   yh      j:

.group z
   z       z
   zh      Z
   
.group
        $        idola
        %        N,eep`?es'ent`?i

        *        ink`?wenk`?wezi
    *)  * (*
        **
   **)  * (_     _::
